District of Columbia statutes.
3-1206.53

Transition.

For a period of 12 months following January 25, 2014, all references in this chapter to “trauma technologists” shall be deemed to refer to persons meeting the requirements for licensure in the District, regardless of whether they are licensed in fact.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 653
as added Jan. 25, 2014, D.C. Law 20-64, § 2(g), 60 DCR 16533
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Trauma Technologists Licensure Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-523, Dec. 18, 2014, 61 DCR 13110, 20 STAT 4437).
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Trauma Technologists Licensure Temporary Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-180, March 7, 2015, 62 DCR 1324).
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-64 added this section.